Colorado, session 2026A, HB1398.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-4-1103, amend
(2)(a)(I) introductory portion and (2)(c); and add (2)(a)(I.5) as follows:
43-4-1103. Multimodal transportation and mitigation options
fund - creation - revenue sources for fund - report - repeal.
(2) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(d) of this
section, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, PRIOR TO
JULY 1, 2026, money must be expended from the fund as follows:
(I.5) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS
SECTION, SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, MONEY MUST BE EXPENDED FROM THE FUND AS
FOLLOWS:
(A) SEVENTY PERCENT TO THE COMMISSION FOR LOCAL
MULTIMODAL PROJECTS; AND
(B) THIRTY PERCENT TO THE COMMISSION FOR STATE MULTIMODAL
PROJECTS THAT ARE SELECTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(c) With respect to the distributions of money for local multimodal
projects required by subsection (2)(a)(I)(A) OR (2)(a)(I.5)(A) of this section,
the commission shall establish a formula for disbursement of the amount
allocated for local multimodal projects, based on population and transit
ridership and other criteria developed in consultation with the transportation
advisory committee created in section 43-1-1104, the transit and rail
advisory committee of the department, the state transportation advisory
committee of the department, transit advocacy organizations, and bicycle
and pedestrian advocacy organizations. Recipients shall provide a match
equal to the amount of the award; except that the commission may create a
formula for reducing or exempting the match requirement for local
governments or agencies due to their size or any other special circumstances
and may also, if recommended by department staff, reduce or exempt any
individual recipient from the match requirement for a specific project.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1398

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1398